Nevada, session 83, AB139.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education the sum of
$15,000,000 for the purpose of awarding grants of money in
accordance with this section to school districts and institutions
within the Nevada System of Higher Education for programs of dual
credit at public schools in this State.
2. The Department shall allocate the money appropriated by
subsection 1 to school districts and institutions within the System to
cover the cost of student fees and instructional materials for pupils
enrolled in new and existing dual credit programs who are able to
demonstrate financial or other hardship, including, without
limitation:
(a) Pupils who, once enrolled in a postsecondary educational
institution, will be first-generation college students;
(b) Pupils from historically underserved communities; or
(c) Pupils who either directly receive or are members of a
household that receives public assistance, as defined in
-
*AB139*

– 2 –
NRS 422A.065, or who are eligible for free or reduced-price
lunches pursuant to 42 U.S.C. §§ 1751 et seq.
3. A school district or institution within the System may
expend money allocated pursuant to subsection 2 on behalf of the
same pupil more than once, to cover the cost of student fees and
instructional materials for multiple classes or semesters, or at
multiple institutions.
4. In allocating the money appropriated by subsection 1, the
Department shall not:
(a) Impose geographic limitations on where a program of dual
credit may be offered or limit whether instruction is offered at an
institution within the System, at a high school or online;
(b) Impose limitations on the subject area of courses offered in a
program of dual credit; or
(c) Interfere with the choice of instructor for a dual credit course
made by an institution within the System.
5. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
a school district or institution within the System, as applicable,
agrees to:
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 18, 2026, that describes, from
the date on which the money was received by the school district or
institution within the System through December 1, 2026:
(1) Each expenditure made from the money appropriated by
subsection 1;
(2) The number of pupils enrolled in dual credit programs for
whom money appropriated by subsection 1 was expended; and
(3) For pupils for whom money appropriated by subsection 1
was expended, high school graduation rates and rates of
matriculation into institutions within the System;
(b) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes, from
the date on which the money was received by the school district or
institution within the System through June 30, 2027:
(1) Each expenditure made from the money appropriated by
subsection 1;
(2) The number of pupils enrolled in dual credit programs for
whom money appropriated by subsection 1 was expended; and
(3) For pupils for whom money appropriated by subsection 1
was expended, high school graduation rates and rates of
matriculation into institutions within the System; and
(c) Prepare the reports required pursuant to this subsection in a
manner that complies with the provisions of the Family Educational
Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g.
-
*AB139*

– 3 –
6. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the fund from which
it was appropriated on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB139*